ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 구성품: 블레이드 서버 인클로저; 컴퓨터 백플레이트/입출력 쉴드; 컴퓨터 전원 공급장치; 컴퓨터 프로세서; 컴퓨터 랙/마운트; 컴퓨터 스타터 키트; 컴퓨터 시스템 냉각 부품; 암호화폐 채굴기; 데스크톱 컴퓨터/서버 케이스; 전자책 단말기 부품; 입출력 카드/어댑터; 입력 장치 부대용품; 입력 장치; 노트북 부품; 전원 공급 장치 액세서리; 스토리지 장치; 태블릿 컴퓨터 부품; USB/FireWire 허브
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦元件: 刀鋒伺服器機箱; 主機背板與 I/O 背板; 電腦電源; 電腦處理器; 電腦架; 電腦入門套件; 電腦系統冷卻零件; 加密貨幣挖礦機; 電腦機殼/伺服器外殼; 電子書閱讀器零件; I/O 卡和轉接器; 輸入裝置配件; 輸入裝置; 筆記型電腦零件; 電源供應器配件; 儲存裝置; 平板電腦零件; USB/FireWire 集線器
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computerkomponenter: Blase server-rack; Holdere til grafikkort; Computer – strømforsyninger; Computer – processorer; Computer – rack og montering; Computer – startsæt; Computer – systemkølingsdele; Cryptovaluta-minere; Computer – kabinetter; Dele til e-bogslæsere; I/O-kort og -adaptere; Inputenheder – tilbehør; Inputenheder; Bærbar computer – dele; Strømforsyningstilbehør; Lagringsenheder; Reservedele til tablets; USB- og FireWire-hubber
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datorkomponenter: Bladserverskåp; Backplates och I/O-skydd; Nätaggregat för datorer; Datorprocessorer; Datorrack; Startkit för datorer; Kylning för datorsystem; Kryptovalutabrytare; Datorlådor; Delar för e-bokläsare; I/O-kort och adaptrar; Tillbehör till inmatningsenheter; Inmatningsenheter; Delar för bärbara datorer; Strömförsörjningstillbehör; Lagringsenheter; Reservdelar till surfplattor; USB- och FireWire-hubbar
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Componente calculatoare: Carcase pentru servere tip blade; Plăci spate și protecții I/O pentru calculatoare; Surse de alimentare pentru calculatoare; Procesoare pentru calculatoare; Sisteme rack și suporturi pentru calculatoare; Kituri configurație de bază pentru calculatoare; Piese pentru răcire calculatoare; Mineri de criptomonede; Carcase pentru computere desktop și servere; Piese pentru cititoare de cărți electronice; Carduri și adaptoare I/O; Accesorii pentru dispozitive de intrare; Dispozitive de intrare; Piese pentru laptopuri; Accesorii pentru surse de alimentare; Dispozitive de stocare; Piese pentru tablete; Hub-uri USB și FireWire
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerkomponenten: Blade-Server-Gehäuse; Computer-Backplates & I/O Shields; Computernetzteile; Prozessoren; Computerregale & -Befestigungssysteme; Computer-Starter-Kits; Computer-Kühlkomponenten; Kryptowährungs-Miner; PC-Gehäuse; Ersatzteile für E-Book-Reader; Computer-Steckkarten; Zubehör für Eingabegeräte; Eingabegeräte; Laptopteile; Netzteil-Zubehör; Speichergeräte; Tablet-PC-Ersatzteile; USB- & FireWire-Hubs
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные компоненты: Корзины для блейд-серверов; Задние пластины и заглушки слотов для компьютеров; Блоки питания для компьютеров; Процессоры для компьютеров; Компьютерные стойки и крепления; Комплекты для сборки компьютеров; Детали для системы охлаждения компьютера; Майнеры криптовалют; Корпусы для настольных компьютеров и серверов; Детали для электронных книг; Платы расширения; Аксессуары для устройств ввода; Устройства ввода; Запчасти для ноутбуков; Аксессуары для блоков питания; Запоминающие устройства; Запчасти для планшетов; Концентраторы USB и FireWire
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Bileşenleri: Blade Sunucu Kasaları; Ekran Kartı Yuva Kapakları; Bilgisayar Güç Kaynakları; Bilgisayar İşlemcileri; Bilgisayar Rafları ve Montaj Kitleri; Bilgisayar Başlangıç Setleri; Bilgisayar Sistemi Soğutma Parçaları; Kripto Para Madencileri; Masaüstü Bilgisayar ve Sunucu Kasaları; E-Kitap Okuyucu Parçaları; Bilgisayar Genişletme Kartları; Giriş Aygıtı Aksesuarları; Giriş Aygıtları; Dizüstü Bilgisayar Parçaları; Güç Kaynağı Aksesuarları; Depolama Aygıtları; Tablet Bilgisayar Parçaları; USB ve FireWire Hublar
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни компоненти: Кутии за блейд сървъри; Задни капаци и I/O панели за компютър; Компютърни захранвания; Компютърни процесори; Рафтове и стойки за компютри; Компютърни стартови комплекти; Части за охлаждане на компютърна система; Устройства за копаене на криптовалута; Кутии за настолни компютри и сървъри; Части за електронни четци; I/O карти и адаптери; Аксесоари за входно устройство; Входни устройства; Части за лаптоп; Аксесоари за захранване; Устройства за съхранение; Части за таблетен компютър; USB и FireWire хъбове
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Composants d’ordinateur: Boîtiers pour serveurs lames; Plaques arrières et connecteurs d’entrée-sortie; Alimentations pour ordinateurs; Processeurs; Baies et supports pour ordinateurs; Kits de démarrage pour ordinateurs; Composants de refroidissement du système informatique; Mineurs de cryptomonnaie; Boîtiers pour ordinateurs de bureau et serveurs; Pièces pour liseuses numériques; Cartes et adaptateurs d’E/S; Accessoires pour périphériques de saisie; Périphériques de saisie; Composants d’ordinateur portable; Accessoires d’alimentation; Périphériques de stockage; Pièces pour tablettes PC; Concentrateurs USB et FireWire
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniške komponente: Ohišja za rezinske strežnike; Računalniške hrbtne plošče in vhodno-izhodni ščiti; Računalniški napajalniki; Računalniški procesorji; Računalniška stojala in nosilci; Računalniški začetni kompleti; Deli za hlajenje računalniških sistemov; Rudarji kriptovalut; Ohišja za namizne računalnike in strežnike; Deli za bralnike e-knjig; Vhodno-izhodne kartice in adapterji; Dodatki za vhodne naprave; Naprave za vnos podatkov; Deli za prenosne računalnike; Dodatki za napajalne enote; Pomnilniške naprave; Deli za tablične računalnike; Vozlišča USB in FireWire
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Componentes para computadoras: Chasis para servidores blade; Carcasas y protectores metálicos para computadoras; Fuentes de alimentación para computadoras; CPU; Carcasas para computadoras; Paquetes básicos; Piezas de refrigeración del sistema para computadoras; Mineros de criptomonedas; Cajas para computadoras y servidores; Piezas para lectores de libros electrónicos; Tarjetas de expansión para computadoras; Accesorios para dispositivos de entrada; Dispositivos de entrada; Repuestos para portátiles; Accesorios para fuente de alimentación; Dispositivos de almacenamiento; Piezas de repuesto para tablets; Concentradores USB/FireWire
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové komponenty: Kryty pre kazetový server; Zadné panely a I/O štíty počítačov; Napájacie zdroje počítačov; Počítačové procesory; Počítačové stojany a držiaky; Počítačové štartovacie súpravy; Chladiace diely počítačového systému; Ťažiari kryptomien; Puzdrá na stolné počítače a servery; Diely čítačky elektronických kníh; I/O karty a adaptéry; Príslušenstvo vstupného zariadenia; Vstupné zariadenia; Časti prenosných počítačov; Príslušenstvo napájacích zdrojov; Úložné zariadenia; Diely tabletového počítača; Rozbočovače USB a FireWire
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Elementy komputera: Szafy na serwery blade; Śledzie do kart graficznych; Zasilacze komputerowe; Procesory komputerowe; Szafy rackowe; Komputerowe zestawy startowe; Części do systemów chłodzenia komputerów; Koparki kryptowalut; Obudowy komputerowe; Części do czytników e-booków; Karty i adaptery I/O; Akcesoria do urządzeń wejściowych; Urządzenia wejściowe; Części do laptopów; Akcesoria do zasilaczy; Pamięci komputerowe; Części do tabletów; Huby USB i FireWire
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC部品・周辺機器: ブレードサーバー筐体; PCバックパネル・I/Oシールド; PC電源ユニット; CPU; PCラック・マウント; PCスターターキット; PC冷却部品; 仮想通貨マイナー; PCタワーケース; 電子書籍リーダーパーツ; PC拡張カード; 入力デバイス関連用品; 入力デバイス; ノートPC用パーツ; 電源ユニット用アクセサリー; ストレージデバイス; タブレットPC用パーツ; USBハブ・Firewireハブ
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机组件: 刀片服务器外壳; 计算机背板和 I/O 护罩; 计算机电源; 计算机处理器; 电脑架/电脑支架; 电脑入门套件; 电脑散热部件; 加密货币矿机; 台式机和服务器机箱; 电子书阅读器部件; I/O卡与适配器; 输入设备配件; 输入设备; 笔记本电脑部件; 电源配件; 存储设备; 平板电脑部件; USB 集线器
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Componentes informáticos: Armários de servidor blade; Placas traseiras e protetores de E/S de computador; Artigos de alimentação de computador; Processadores de computador; Bastidores e suportes de computador; Kits de starter de computador; Peças de refrigeração de computador; Mineradores de criptomoeda; Caixas de servidor e de computador de secretária; Peças de leitor E-Book; Adaptadores e cartões de E/S; Acessórios de dispositivo de entrada; Dispositivos de entrada; Peças de portátil; Acessórios para fonte de alimentação; Dispositivos de armazenamento; Peças de tablet; USB e FireWire Hubs
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-komponensek: Blade szerver házak; Számítógép-hátlapok és I/O pajzsok; Számítógépes tápegységek; Számítógépes processzorok; Számítógépes állványok és rögzítők; Számítógépes indítókészletek; Számítógépes rendszer hűtőalkatrészek; Kriptovaluta-bányászok; Asztaliszámítógép- és szervertokok; E-könyv-olvasó-alkatrészek; I/O kártyák és adapterek; Bevitelieszköz-kiegészítők; Beviteli eszközök; Laptopalkatrészek; Tápegység-kiegészítők; Tárolóeszközök; Táblagépalkatrészek; USB és FireWire hubok
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Componentes para computador: Caixas para servidores blade; Espelhos adaptadores para placa de vídeo; Fonte de alimentação de computador; CPUs; Racks e suportes para computadores; Starter kits para computadores; Peças de sistemas de refrigeração para computadores; Mineradores de criptomoeda; Estojos para desktop; Peças para leitores de e-books; Placas de expansão para computadores; Acessórios para dispositivos de entrada; Dispositivos de entrada; Peças para laptops; Acessórios para fonte de alimentação; Dispositivos de armazenamento; Peças para tablets; Hubs USB e FireWire
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítačové komponenty: Skříně pro servery blade; Krycí plechy konektorů počítače; Zdroje napájení; Počítačové procesory; Skříně a držáky na počítače; Sady Starter Kit; Díly chlazení počítačů; Těžební zařízení na kryptoměny; Počítačové a serverové skříně; Díly čteček elektronických knih; Rozšiřující počítačové karty; Vstupní zařízení – příslušenství; Vstupní zařízení; Díly k notebookům; Příslušenství zdrojů napájení; Paměťová zařízení; Díly pro tablety; Rozbočovače USB a FireWire
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonekomponentit: Korttipalvelinkotelot; Tietokoneen taustalevyt ja I/O-suojat; Tietokoneiden virtalähteet; Tietokoneprosessorit; Tietokonetelineet; Tietokoneen aloituspaketit; Tietokoneen jäähdytysjärjestelmän osat; Kryptovaluuttalouhija; Tietokone- ja palvelinkotelot; E-kirjanlukijan osat; I/O-kortit ja -muuntimet; Syöttölaitteiden lisätarvikkeet; Syöttölaitteet; Kannettavan tietokoneen osat; Virtalähdetarvike; Tallennuslaitteet; Tablettitietokoneen osat; USB- ja FireWire-hubit
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Računalne komponente: Kućišta za blade servere; Stražnje i IO ploče za računala; Računalna napajanja; Računalni procesori; Stalci i nosači za računala; Računalni setovi za početnike; Dijelovi za hlađenje računalnog sustava; Rudari kriptovaluta; Kućišta za stolna računala i servere; Dijelovi e-čitača; I/O kartice i adapteri; Pribor za ulazne uređaje; Ulazni uređaji; Dijelovi prijenosnog računala; Dodaci za napajanje; Uređaji za pohranu podataka; Dijelovi tablet računala; USB i FireWire čvorišta
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Εξαρτήματα υπολογιστή: Περιβλήματα διακομιστή Blade; Πίσω πλάκες υπολογιστών & προστατευτικά I/O; Τροφοδοτικά υπολογιστών; Επεξεργαστές υπολογιστών; Ράφια και βάσεις υπολογιστών; Σετ εκκίνησης υπολογιστών; Ανταλλακτικά ψύξης συστήματος υπολογιστών; Εξορύκτες κρυπτονομισμάτων; Κουτιά επιτραπέζιων υπολογιστών & διακομιστών; Ανταλλακτικά συσκευών ανάγνωσης ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων; Κάρτες και προσαρμογείς I/O; Αξεσουάρ συσκευής εισόδου; Συσκευές εισόδου; Ανταλλακτικά Laptop; Αξεσουάρ τροφοδοτικών; Συσκευές αποθήκευσης; Ανταλλακτικά tablet; Κόμβοι (Hubs) USB & FireWire
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ส่วนประกอบคอมพิวเตอร์: ตู้เบลดเซิร์ฟเวอร์; ที่ปิด I/O และแผ่นด้านหลังคอมพิวเตอร์; พาวเวอร์ซัพพลายคอมพิวเตอร์; หน่วยประมวลผลคอมพิวเตอร์; แร็คและขายึดคอมพิวเตอร์; คอมพิวเตอร์ชุดเริ่มต้น; อุปกรณ์ระบายความร้อนในคอมพิวเตอร์; เครื่องขุดคริปโทเคอร์เรนซี; เคสคอมพิวเตอร์เดสท็อปและเซิร์ฟเวอร์; อะไหล่เครื่องอ่านอีบุ๊ก; การ์ด I/O และอะแดปเตอร์; อุปกรณ์สำหรับอุปกรณ์อินพุต; อุปกรณ์ป้อนข้อมูล; อะไหล่แล็ปท็อป; อุปกรณ์เสริมแหล่งจ่ายไฟ; อุปกรณ์จัดเก็บข้อมูล; ชิ้นส่วนคอมพิวเตอร์แท็บเล็ต; ฮับ USB และไฟร์ไวร์
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių komponentai: „Blade“ tipo serverių korpusai; Kompiuterių galinės plokštės ir įvesties / išvesties skydeliai; Kompiuterių maitinimo šaltiniai; Kompiuterių procesoriai; Kompiuterių stovai ir laikikliai; Kompiuterių surinkimo rinkiniai; Kompiuterių sistemų aušinimo dalys; Kriptovaliutų kasimo įrenginiai; Stalinių kompiuterių ir serverių korpusai; Elektroninių knygų skaitytuvų dalys; Įvesties / išvesties plokštės ir adapteriai; Įvesties įrenginių priedai; Įvesties įrenginiai; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių dalys; Maitinimo šaltinių priedai; Laikmenos įrenginiai; Planšetinių kompiuterių dalys; USB ir „FireWire“ šakotuvai
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeronderdelen: Bladeserverbehuizingen; Achterpanelen voor computerkast; Computervoeding; CPU's; Computerracks en -standaarden; Starterkits voor computers; Koelingonderdelen voor computersystemen; Cryptocurrency miners; Computerbehuizingen; Onderdelen voor e-readers; Computeruitbreidingskaarten; Accessoires voor invoerapparatuur; Invoerapparaten; Laptoponderdelen; Voeding accessoires; Opslagapparaten; Onderdelen voor tablets; USB- en FireWire-hubs
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Linh kiện máy tính: Thùng máy máy chủ phiến; Tấm chắn sau và tấm chắn I/O máy tính; Nguồn điện máy tính; Bộ xử lý máy tính; Tủ & Giá để máy tính; Bộ công cụ starter kit máy tính; Bộ phận làm mát hệ thống máy tính; Máy đào cryptocurrency; Vỏ máy tính để bàn & máy chủ; Phụ tùng máy đọc sách điện tử; Thẻ đầu vào/đầu ra và bộ điều hợp; Phụ kiện thiết bị đầu vào; Thiết bị đầu vào; Linh kiện máy tính xách tay; Phụ kiện nguồn điện; Thiết bị lưu trữ; Linh kiện máy tính bảng; Đầu cắm USB & Wifi nhiều cổng
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Datamaskinkomponenter: Bladserverkabinetter; Bakplater og I/O-skjold til datamaskiner; Strømforsyninger til datamaskiner; Datamaskinprosessorer; Datamaskinstativer og -fester; Startsett for datamaskiner; Kjøledeler for datamaskinsystemer; Kryptovaluta-utvinnere; Kabinetter for stasjonære datamaskiner og servere; Deler til E-boklesere; I/O-kort og adaptere; Tilbehør for inndataenheter; Inndataenheter; Deler til bærbare datamaskiner; Strømforsyningstilbehør; Oppbevaringsutstyr; Deler til nettbrett; USB- og FireWire-hubber
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Components: Blade Server Enclosures; Computer Backplates & I/O Shields; Computer Power Supplies; Computer Processors; Computer Racks & Mounts; Computer Starter Kits; Computer System Cooling Parts; Cryptocurrency Miners; Desktop Computer & Server Cases; E-Book Reader Parts; I/O Cards & Adapters; Input Device Accessories; Input Devices; Laptop Parts; Power Supply Accessories; Storage Devices; Tablet Computer Parts; USB & FireWire Hubs
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Componenti per computer: Chassis per blade server; Piastre e supporti I/O; Alimentazione per computer; CPU; Scaffali e supporti computer; Starter kit per computer; Componenti di raffreddamento per PC; Minatori di criptovaluta; Case per server e PC; Componenti per lettori di e-book; Schede di espansione per computer; Accessori per dispositivi di input; Dispositivi di input; Ricambi per laptop; Accessori dell'alimentatore; Dispositivi archiviazione; Ricambi per tablet; Hub USB e FireWire